Hawaii, session 2026, GM1110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the Aloha order of
merit was established to recognize individuals who have made
significant contributions and achieved national or international
recognition in a field either by a single event or by a totality
of work that has been pioneering in that field or outstanding in
the long term. The legislature also finds that many exceptional
and notable individuals are deserving of recognition
specifically for their contributions to the State. While the
Aloha order of merit honors individuals who have made national
and international contributions and achieved recognition, the
legislature believes there should be a similar program to honor
individuals who have made their mark on the State.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish the
Hawaii leadership awards program to honor individuals who have
made considerable and outstanding contributions to the State in
their respective fields and serve as inspirations to others.
2026-2511 SB3022 HDl HMSO
iBiiiiiiiBiiiiiiiinniin

S.B. NO.
SECTION 2. Chapter 9, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended
by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to
read as follows:
"§9- Hawaii leadership awards program. (a) There is
established within the state archives for administrative
purposes the Hawaii leadership awards program to honor
individuals who:
(1) Have made considerable and outstanding contributions
to the State; and
(2) Serve as an inspiration to others.
(b) Awards shall be presented annually to individuals in
each of the following categories:
(1) Arts;
(2) Business and labor;
(3) Entertainment;
(4) Food and drink;
(5) Literature;
(6) Music;
(7) Sports;
(8) Science;
(9) Community engagement;
2026-2511 SB3022 HDl HMSO
MMIMIWIIIIIIiHIII

Page 3 S.B. NO.
(10) Public service;
(11) Friend of Hawaii; and
(12) Profile in courage;
who have resided in the State for a period of at least seven
years; provided that no individual receiving an award pursuant
to paragraph (11) shall reside in the State.
(c) The governor, lieutenant governor, and members of the
Hawaii leadership awards selection committee, or their
designees, shall present the awards to awardees annually. No
individual shall receive more than one award per year.
(d) Each awardee shall:
(1) Receive a certificate of honor and medal; and
(2) Have the awardee's story and a statement of
recognition displayed in a conspicuous place for a
period of one year; provided that after the year, the
awardee's information shall be added to a permanent
archival exhibit of awardees, to include those from
the Aloha order of merit; provided further that the
awardee's information shall be archived within the
state archives.
2026-2511 SB3022 HDl HMSO 3
IIMHIIIillHIHIil

Page 4 S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
(e) Awardees shall be selected by a Hawaii leadership
awards selection committee who shall ensure visibility and fair
and equitable consideration for all nominees in its evaluation
and selection process. The selection committee shall be
composed of the following members:
(1) One individual appointed by the president of the
senate;
(2) One individual appointed by the speaker of the house
of representatives;
(3) One individual appointed by the governor;
(4) One individual appointed by the lieutenant governor;
and
(5) One individual from the state archives.
(f) Nominations for awardees shall be accepted by the
Hawaii leadership awards selection committee from the public.
(g) The state archives shall coordinate with respective
stakeholders to administer and execute the program."
SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2511 SB3022 HDl HMSO

■BlilllMIIHilHIIIIIII

S.B. NO.
APPROVED this 14th day of May , 2026

S.B.No. 3022, S.D. 1,H.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 22, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 3022, SD 1,HD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE
STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 14, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby eertify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives